Utah statutes.
78B-3-502.   Limitation of therapist's duty to warn.
(1)  A therapist has no duty to warn or take precautions to provide protection
from any violent behavior of his client or patient, except when that client or
patient communicated to the therapist an actual threat of physical violence
against a clearly identified or reasonably identifiable victim.  That duty
shall be discharged if the therapist makes reasonable efforts to communicate
the threat to the victim, and notifies a law enforcement officer or agency of
the threat.
(2)  An action may not be brought against a therapist for breach of trust or
privilege, or for disclosure of confidential information, based on a
therapist's communication of information to a third party in an effort to
discharge his duty in accordance with Subsection (1).
(3)  This section does not limit or effect a therapist's duty to report child
abuse or neglect in accordance with Section 62A-4a-403.
